Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine. "Accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine" means deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin anynew text end veterinary collegenew text begin , school,new text end or division of a university or college that offers the degree of doctor of veterinary medicine or its equivalent and that conforms to the standards required for accreditation or approval by the American Veterinary Medical Association Council on Education. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Accredited program of veterinary technology. new text end new text begin "Accredited program of veterinary technology" means any postsecondary educational program that offers a degree in veterinary technology or its equivalent and is accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and Activities. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Animal. "Animal" deleted text begin does not include poultrydeleted text end new text begin means any organism, except humans, that has sensation and the power of voluntary movement and that requires oxygen and organic nutrientsnew text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Client. new text end new text begin "Client" means a patient's owner, owner's agent, or other person presenting a patient for care. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Compensation. "Compensation" includes but is not limited to all fees, monetary rewards, discounts, new text begin remunerations, new text end and emoluments received directly or indirectly. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5b. new text end new text begin Consent. new text end new text begin "Consent" means verbal or written permission given by a client for performing an examination, administering a diagnostic test, administering a procedure, or providing treatment to a patient. Consent includes permission that is express or implied from the circumstances. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5c. new text end new text begin Consulting. new text end new text begin "Consulting" means seeking and receiving advice in person, by telephone, electronically, or by any other method of communication from a licensed veterinarian or any other person whose expertise, in the opinion of the person seeking advice, would benefit the management of the case. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5d. new text end new text begin Dispensing. new text end new text begin "Dispensing" means distributing veterinary drugs requiring a prescription for the use of a patient, over-the-counter veterinary drugs for the use of a patient, or human drugs for the extra-label use of a patient by a person licensed as a pharmacist by the Board of Pharmacy or a person licensed by the Board of Veterinary Medicine. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5e. new text end new text begin Donor. new text end new text begin "Donor" means: new text end new text begin (1) an individual at least 18 years of age if the drug or medical supply that is donated is obtained legally and meets the requirements of section 151.555 for donation; or new text end new text begin (2) any entity legally authorized to possess medicine with a license or permit in good standing in the state in which the entity is located, without further restrictions, including but not limited to a health care facility, skilled nursing facility, assisted living facility, pharmacy, wholesaler, and drug manufacturer. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6b. new text end new text begin Emergency stabilization. new text end new text begin "Emergency stabilization" means care provided to a patient that has a life-threatening condition when immediate treatment is necessary to sustain the patient's life, prevent the deterioration of the patient's bodily functions, or alleviate or end the patient's suffering. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6c. new text end new text begin Extra-label use. new text end new text begin "Extra-label use" means the actual or intended use of a human drug or veterinary drug in the treatment of an animal in a manner that is not in accordance with the drug's labeling. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, subdivision 7a, is amended to read: Subd. 7a. Licensed veterinary techniciannew text begin or veterinary techniciannew text end . "Licensed veterinary technician" new text begin or "veterinary technician" new text end means a person licensed by the board under section 156.077. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7b. new text end new text begin Licensed veterinarian. new text end new text begin "Licensed veterinarian" means any veterinarian who holds an active license from the board under section 156.02 to practice veterinary medicine in the state. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Licensee. "Licensee" means a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine new text begin or veterinary technology new text end in the state of Minnesota. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9a. new text end new text begin Patient. new text end new text begin "Patient" means any animal or group of animals receiving veterinary care from a licensed veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9b. new text end new text begin Person. new text end new text begin "Person" means any individual; firm; partnership, including a general, limited, or limited liability partnership; association; joint venture; cooperative; corporation; limited liability company; or any other group or combination acting in concert, and whether or not acting as a principal, partner, member, trustee, fiduciary, receiver, or as any other kind of legal or personal representative, or as the successor in interest, assignee, agent, factor, servant, employee, director, officer, or any other representative of the person. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9c. new text end new text begin Physical rehabilitation. new text end new text begin "Physical rehabilitation" means the use of therapeutic exercise and the application of modalities intended to restore or facilitate a patient's movement and physical function impacted by disease, injury, or disability. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, subdivision 10b, is amended to read: Subd. 10b. Remote supervision. "Remote supervision" means: (1) a veterinarian is not deleted text begin on the premisesdeleted text end new text begin available to provide direct supervisionnew text end but is acquainted with the keeping and care of an animal by virtue of an examination of the animal or medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal is kept;new text begin andnew text end (2) the new text begin supervising new text end veterinarian has given written or oral instructions to a licensed veterinary technician for ongoing care of an animal and is available by telephone or other form of immediate communicationdeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) the employee treating the animal timely enters into the animal's medical record documentation of the treatment provided and the documentation is reviewed by the veterinarian. deleted text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10c. new text end new text begin Surgery. new text end new text begin "Surgery" means a treatment that is performed for the purpose of structurally altering a patient through the incision or destruction of tissues in the practice of veterinary medicine. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10d. new text end new text begin Telemedicine. new text end new text begin "Telemedicine" means the practice of veterinary medicine through the use of telecommunications technology that allows a licensed veterinarian with a properly established veterinarian-client-patient relationship to virtually evaluate, virtually diagnose, and virtually treat a patient. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10e. new text end new text begin Teletriage. new text end new text begin "Teletriage" means a safe, appropriate, and timely assessment and management of a patient, including providing first aid or making an immediate referral to a licensed veterinarian, without the need for a veterinarian-client-patient relationship and under uncertain and urgent conditions, by telephone or electronically. Teletriage does not include providing a diagnosis to a patient. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10f. new text end new text begin Veterinarian. new text end new text begin "Veterinarian" means an individual who has received a doctor of veterinary medicine degree or its equivalent from an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine or is the holder of an ECFVG or a PAVE certificate. new text end Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10g. new text end new text begin Veterinarian-client-patient relationship. new text end new text begin "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" has the meaning given in section 156.16, subdivision 12. new text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10h. new text end new text begin Veterinary medical facility. new text end new text begin "Veterinary medical facility" means the premises, office, unit, structure, mobile unit, or area used for the practice of veterinary medicine. Veterinary medical facility does not include the premises of an owner when the owner's animal is treated on the owner's premises. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11a. new text end new text begin Veterinary specialist. new text end new text begin "Veterinary specialist" means a veterinarian who has been awarded and maintains certification from a veterinary specialty organization recognized by the American Veterinary Medical Association or other veterinary specialty organization that maintains comparable certification requirements as determined by the board. new text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11b. new text end new text begin Veterinary Technician National Exam. new text end new text begin "Veterinary Technician National Exam" means the examination administered by the American Association of Veterinary State Boards to evaluate the competency of entry-level veterinary technicians and veterinary technologists. new text end Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11c. new text end new text begin Veterinary technician specialist. new text end new text begin "Veterinary technician specialist" means a veterinary technician or veterinary technologist who has been awarded and maintains certification from a veterinary technician specialty academy recognized by the National Association of Veterinary Technicians in America or another veterinary technician specialty organization that maintains comparable certification requirements as determined by the board. new text end Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.001, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11d. new text end new text begin Veterinary technologist. new text end new text begin "Veterinary technologist" means a person who has earned a baccalaureate degree in veterinary technology from a four-year program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association Committee on Veterinary Technician Education and Activities or the Canadian Veterinary Medical Association. new text end Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.01, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Creation; membership. There is hereby created a state Board of Veterinary Medicine deleted text begin which shall consistdeleted text end new text begin that consistsnew text end of new text begin nine board members. new text end Two new text begin members must be new text end public members as defined by section 214.02 deleted text begin and five licensed veterinariansdeleted text end appointed by the governornew text begin , five members must be licensed veterinarians appointed by the governor, one member must be a licensed veterinary technician appointed by the governor, and one member must be a licensed veterinarian appointed by the governor or a licensed veterinary technician appointed by the governornew text end . Each appointee deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be a resident of the state of Minnesota, and the veterinarian new text begin and veterinary technician new text end members of the board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end have practiced veterinary medicine new text begin or veterinary technology new text end in this state for at least five years prior to their appointment. Membership terms, compensation of members, removal of members, the filling of membership vacancies, and fiscal year and reporting requirements deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be as provided in sections 214.07 to 214.09. The provision of staff, administrative services and office space; the review and processing of complaints; the setting of board fees; and other provisions relating to board operations deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be as provided in chapter 214. Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.01, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Officers. The board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end elect from its number a president and deleted text begin suchdeleted text end other officers as are necessary, all from within its membership. One person may hold the offices of both secretary and treasurer. deleted text begin The board shall have a seal and the power to subpoena witnesses, to administer oaths, and take testimony. It shall make, alter, or amend rules that are necessary to carry this chapter into effect. It shall hold examinations for applicants for license to engage in veterinary practice at a time and place of its own choosing. Notice of an examination must be posted 90 days before the date set for the examination in all veterinary schools approved by the board in the state, and must be published in the American Association of Veterinary State Boards "Directory of Veterinary Licensure Requirements." The board may hold other meetings it deems necessary; but no meeting shall exceed three days duration.deleted text end Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Duties and authority of the board. new text end new text begin (a) The board may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, and take testimony. new text end new text begin (b) The board may adopt and amend rules that are necessary to implement this chapter. new text end new text begin (c) The board must administer examinations to applicants for licenses to practice veterinary medicine or veterinary technology. new text end new text begin (d) The board may hold any meeting that the board deems necessary, except that a meeting held by the board must not exceed three days in duration. new text end new text begin (e) The board must have a seal. new text end Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 156.015, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. License verification. The board may charge a fee not to exceed $25 per license verification to a licensee for verification of new text begin the person's new text end licensure status provided to deleted text begin otherdeleted text end new text begin anothernew text end veterinary licensing deleted text begin boardsdeleted text end new text begin boardnew text end . Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. License application. new text begin (a) An new text end application for a license to practice veterinary medicine in this state deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be made in writing to the Board of Veterinary Medicine upon a form furnished by the board, accompanied by satisfactory evidence that the applicant is at least 18 years of age, is of good moral character, and has one of the following: (1) a diploma conferring the degree of doctor of veterinary medicine, or an equivalent degree, from an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine; (2) an ECFVG or new text begin a new text end PAVE certificate; or (3) a certificate from the dean of an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine stating that the applicant is a student in good standing expecting to be graduated at the completion of the current academic year of the college in which the applicant is enrolled. new text begin (b) new text end The application deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end contain the information and material required by subdivision 2 and any other information that the board may, in its sound judgment, require. The application deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be filed with the board at least 60 days before the date of the examination. If the board deems it advisable, it may require that deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end application deleted text begin bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end verified by the oath of the applicant. Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.02, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Required with application. Every application deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end contain deleted text begin the following information and materialdeleted text end : (1) the new text begin nonrefundable new text end application fee deleted text begin set by the board in the form of a check or money order payable to the board, which fee is not returnable in the event permission to take the examination is denied for good causedeleted text end ; (2) new text begin one of the following:new text end new text begin (i) new text end a copy of a diploma from an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine deleted text begin or a certificate from the dean or secretary of an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine showing the time spent in the school and the date when the applicant was duly and regularly graduated or will duly and regularly graduatedeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (ii) an official transcript as proof of the applicant's degree;new text end or deleted text begin verificationdeleted text end new text begin (iii) if the applicant is a graduate of a foreign college of veterinary medicine, a certificate of satisfactory completionnew text end of new text begin the new text end ECFVG or PAVE deleted text begin certificationdeleted text end new text begin program with a copy of the applicant's diploma and a translation of the diploma if the diploma is not in Englishnew text end ;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (3) affidavits of at least two veterinarians and three adults who are not related to the applicant setting forth how long a time, when, and under what circumstances they have known the applicant, and any other facts as may be proper to enable the board to determine the qualifications of the applicant; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end if the applicant has served in the armed forces, a copy of discharge papers. Sec. 35. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.03, is amended to read: 156.03 EXAMINATION; PAYMENT. Upon filing the application and any other papersdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end affidavits, new text begin if applicable; new text end or proof that the Board of Veterinary Medicine may require, together with the payment of the application fee and appropriate examination fee as set by the board, the board deleted text begin shall issuedeleted text end new text begin must make availablenew text end to the applicant deleted text begin a permit to take the national examination in veterinary medicine anddeleted text end the new text begin online new text end Minnesota deleted text begin Veterinarydeleted text end Jurisprudence deleted text begin Examinationdeleted text end new text begin Examnew text end . All applicants must be evaluated using an examination prescribed by the board. A passing score for the deleted text begin national examinationdeleted text end new text begin North American Veterinary Licensing Examinationnew text end must be the criterion referenced passing score as determined by the deleted text begin National Board Examination Committeedeleted text end new text begin International Council for Veterinary Assessmentnew text end . Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.04, is amended to read: 156.04 BOARD TO ISSUE LICENSE. The Board of Veterinary Medicine deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end issue new text begin a license to practice veterinary medicine new text end to every applicant whonew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) new text end has successfully passed the required examinationdeleted text begin , whodeleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) either: new text end new text begin (i)new text end has received a diploma conferring the degree of doctor of veterinary medicine or an equivalent degree from an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicinenew text begin ;new text end or new text begin (ii) has new text end an ECFVG or new text begin a new text end PAVE certificatedeleted text begin , and who shall have been adjudged to be duly qualified to practice veterinary medicine, a license to practicedeleted text end . Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.05, is amended to read: 156.05 LICENSE. The license deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be subscribed by the president and secretary of the Board of Veterinary Medicine and have affixed to it by the new text begin executive new text end director the seal of the board.new text begin Upon the board's request, a person licensed under this chapter must produce a copy of the person's license within seven days of receiving the request.new text end Sec. 38. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.06, is amended to read: 156.06 LICENSE RECORDED. The license, before issued, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be recorded in a deleted text begin book or computerdeleted text end database to be kept deleted text begin in the office whichdeleted text end new text begin bynew text end the Board of Veterinary Medicine deleted text begin shall establishdeleted text end for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. deleted text begin Thesedeleted text end new text begin Thenew text end records deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin kept under this section mustnew text end be available for public inspection with proper restrictions as to their preservation as provided in section 13.41. Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.07, is amended to read: 156.07 LICENSE RENEWAL. deleted text begin Persons licensed under this chapter shall conspicuously display their license in their principal place of business. deleted text end new text begin (a) new text end Persons now licensed in this state, or who deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin arenew text end hereafter deleted text begin bedeleted text end licensed by the Board of Veterinary Medicine as veterinarians or veterinary technicians, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end periodically renew their license in a manner prescribed by the board. The board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end establish license renewal fees and continuing education requirements. The board may establish, by rule, an inactive license category, at a lower fee, for licensees not actively engaged in the practice of veterinary medicine or veterinary technology within the state of Minnesota. The board may assess a charge for delinquent payment of a renewal fee. new text begin (b) new text end Any person who is licensed to practice veterinary medicine or veterinary technology in this state pursuant to this chapterdeleted text begin , shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end entitled to receive a license to continue to practice upon making application to the board and complying with the terms of this section and rules of the board. Sec. 40. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.071, is amended to read: 156.071 REINSTATEMENT OF EXPIRED LICENSE. new text begin (a) new text end Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an expired licensedeleted text begin , whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end is suspended by the board pursuant to section 156.07deleted text begin ,deleted text end may be reinstated at any time within five years after its suspension on filing an application with the board and by payment of the renewal fee in effect on the last preceding regular renewal date, plus all back fees, late fees, and reinstatement fees. In addition, satisfactory evidence of meeting yearly continuing education requirements must be furnished to the board. new text begin (b) new text end A person who fails to renew a license within five years after its suspension may not renew it, and it deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not be restored, reissued, or reinstated thereafter, deleted text begin but suchdeleted text end new text begin except thenew text end person may apply for and obtain a new license on complying with the following conditions: (1) the person is of good moral character; (2) no fact, circumstance, or condition exists deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end , if the license were issued, would justify deleted text begin itsdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end revocation or suspensionnew text begin of the license according to section 156.081, subdivision 2new text end ; (3) the person takes and passes deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin allnew text end examinationsdeleted text begin , if any, which would be required if the person were then applying for a license for the first time, or otherwise establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest the person is qualified to practice veterinary medicinedeleted text end new text begin required for an application for an initial licensenew text end ; and (4) the person pays all deleted text begin of thedeleted text end new text begin applicablenew text end fees deleted text begin that would bedeleted text end required deleted text begin if the person were then applying for the license for the first timedeleted text end new text begin by the boardnew text end . Sec. 41. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.072, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application. A doctor of veterinary medicine duly admitted to practice in any state, commonwealth, territory, or district of the United States or province of Canada desiring permission to practice veterinary medicine in this state shall submit an application to the board upon forms prescribed by the board. deleted text begin Upon proof of licensure to practice in any United States or Canadian jurisdiction and having been actively engaged in practicing veterinary medicine therein, for at least three of the five years next preceding the application, or having been engaged in full time teaching of veterinary medicine in an approved or accredited college for at least three of the five years next preceding the application, or any combination thereof, the national examination in veterinary medicine may be waived, upon the recommendation of the board, and the applicant be admitted to practice without examination. However, the board may impose any other examinations it considers proper.deleted text end Sec. 42. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.072, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Required with application. deleted text begin Such doctor of veterinary medicine shall accompany the application by the followingdeleted text end new text begin An applicant for a license to practice veterinary medicine in the state must provide the following to the boardnew text end : (1)new text begin either:new text end new text begin (i)new text end a copy of a diploma from an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine deleted text begin or certification from the dean, registrar, or secretary of an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine attesting to the applicant's graduation from an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or new text begin (ii) a copy of a diploma from a foreign college of veterinary medicine, a translation of the diploma if the diploma is not in English, andnew text end a certificate of satisfactory completion of the ECFVG or PAVE program; deleted text begin (2) affidavits of two licensed practicing doctors of veterinary medicine residing in the United States or Canadian licensing jurisdiction in which the applicant is currently practicing, attesting that they are well acquainted with the applicant, that the applicant is a person of good moral character, and has been actively engaged in practicing or teaching in such jurisdiction for the period above prescribed; deleted text end new text begin (2) a copy of the applicant's valid unrestricted license to practice veterinary medicine in good standing from a state or territory in the United States or Canada; new text end (3) a certificate from the regulatory agency having jurisdiction over the conduct of practice of veterinary medicine that such applicant is in good standing and is not the subject of disciplinary action or pending disciplinary action; (4) a certificate from all other jurisdictions in which the applicant holds a currently active license or held a license within the past ten years, stating that the applicant is and was in good standing and has not been subject to disciplinary action; (5) in lieu of clauses (3) and (4), certification from the Veterinary Information Verification Agency that the applicant's licensure is in good standing; (6) a new text begin nonrefundable new text end fee deleted text begin as set by the boarddeleted text end deleted text begin in form of check or money order payable to the board, no part of which shall be refunded should the application be denieddeleted text end ; (7) score reports on previously taken national examinations in veterinary medicine, certified by the Veterinary Information Verification Agencydeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin unless the board has waived this requirement because the applicant's current American Association of Veterinary State Boards licensing jurisdiction officially reported North American Veterinary Licensing Examination scores to the board;new text end (8) if requesting waiver of examination, provide evidence of meeting licensure requirements in the state of the applicant's original licensure that were substantially equal to the requirements for licensure in Minnesota in existence at that timedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (9) proof that the applicant received a passing score for the Minnesota Veterinarian Jurisprudence Examination; and new text end new text begin (10) a completed criminal background check. new text end Sec. 43. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.076, is amended to read: 156.076 DIRECT SUPERVISION; UNLICENSED VETERINARY EMPLOYEES. (a) An unlicensed veterinary employee may only administer medication or render auxiliary or supporting assistance under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian or licensed veterinary technician. (b) This section does not prohibit: (1) the performance of generalized nursing tasks ordered by the veterinarian and performed by an unlicensed employee on inpatient animals during the hours when a veterinarian is not on the premises; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2)new text begin the performance of commonly accepted livestock management practices under remote supervision; ornew text end new text begin (3)new text end under emergency conditions, an unlicensed employee from rendering lifesaving aid and treatment to an animal in the absence of a veterinarian if the animal is in a life-threatening condition and requires immediate treatment to sustain life or prevent further injury. Sec. 44. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.077, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Required with application. A completed application must contain the following information and material: (1) the application fee set by the board, which is not refundable if permission to take the jurisprudence examination is denied for good cause; (2) proof of graduation from a veterinary technology program accredited or approved by the American Veterinary Medical Association or Canadian Veterinary Medical Association;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (3) affidavits from at least two licensed veterinarians and three adults who are not related to the applicant that establish how long, when, and under what circumstances the references have known the applicant and any other facts that may enable the board to determine the applicant's qualifications; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end if the applicant has served in the armed forces, a copy of the applicant's discharge papers. Sec. 45. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.077, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Pharmaceutical services. new text end new text begin (a) A licensed veterinary technician must: new text end new text begin (1) ensure that a prescription drug or prescription biologic is properly administered to a patient; or new text end new text begin (2) provide instructions to a client on the proper administration of a drug or biologic to a patient if the licensed veterinary technician will not be administering or supervising the administration of the drug to the patient. new text end new text begin (b) A veterinary technician must store and dispense drugs and biologics to clients according to section 151.35 and The United States Pharmacopeia and the National Formulary, 1990 edition, published by the United States Pharmacopeial Convention, Inc., Rockville, Maryland. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 46. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.077, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Record keeping. new text end new text begin (a) A licensed veterinary technician working under a veterinarian's direct or remote supervision on a patient, group of patients, herd, or flock, regardless of whether the patient, group, herd, or flock is in the veterinarian's custody at a veterinary facility or on the owner's or caretaker's premises, must prepare a written medical record or electronic medical record regarding the patient, group, herd, or flock that contains, at a minimum: new text end new text begin (1) the owner's name, address, and telephone number; new text end new text begin (2) if applicable, the identity of the patient, including the patient's name, age, sex, and breed; new text end new text begin (3) the dates of examination, treatment, and surgery; new text end new text begin (4) a brief history of the condition of the patient, group of patients, herd, or flock; new text end new text begin (5) examination findings; new text end new text begin (6) laboratory and radiographic reports; new text end new text begin (7) the veterinarian's tentative diagnosis; new text end new text begin (8) the veterinarian's treatment plan; and new text end new text begin (9) the veterinarian's prescribed medication and treatment, including the dosage and frequency of any prescribed medication. new text end new text begin (b) A licensed veterinary technician must maintain an individual written medical record or electronic medical record for each patient, except a licensed veterinary technician may maintain one medical record for a group of patients if: new text end new text begin (1) the patients are livestock as defined in section 17A.03, subdivision 5; horses; or a litter of animals; and new text end new text begin (2) the record contains the information required in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) Within two weeks of receiving a written request for records, a veterinary technician under the direct or remote supervision of a veterinarian must release a patient's medical records or an accurate summary of the patient's medical records to the owner or owner's authorized agent, including the board. A supervising veterinarian may charge a reasonable fee for copying or preparing a summary of records, except in the case of a board investigation of a possible violation of section 156.081 or other statute or rule that the board is authorized to enforce. new text end new text begin (d) A radiograph must be permanently identified. A licensed veterinary technician must only release a radiograph upon the written request of a veterinarian who has the written authorization of the owner of the patient to whom the radiograph pertains. The owner must return a radiograph within a reasonable time to the veterinary practice that originally prepared the radiograph. new text end new text begin (e) A licensed veterinary technician must keep medical records private and must not release medical records to third parties unless authorized by the client or required by law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 47. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.077, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Humane care. new text end new text begin A licensed veterinary technician must treat animals entrusted by a client to the supervising veterinarian consistent with prevailing professional standards of humane treatment and care. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 48. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.077, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Continuing education. new text end new text begin (a) A licensed veterinary technician must complete at least 16 hours of continuing education credits during each biennial licensing period. Of those 16 hours, at least 12 hours of continuing education credits must be in a medical category. new text end new text begin (b) Upon submitting an application to the board for the renewal of a license to practice veterinary technology, an applicant must provide documentation to the board that the applicant completed at least 16 continuing education credit hours according to paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) A licensed veterinary technician must not carry forward excess continuing credit hours into the next licensing period. new text end new text begin (d) A licensed veterinary technician must take additional continuing education required by the board if, in the course of a disciplinary proceeding, the board determines that remedial education in a specific subject area is necessary. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 49. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.078, is amended to read: 156.078 NONRESIDENTS; LICENSED VETERINARY TECHNICIANS. A credentialed veterinary technician duly admitted to practice in any state, commonwealth, territory, or district of the United States or province of Canada who desires permission to practice veterinary technology in deleted text begin this state shalldeleted text end new text begin Minnesota mustnew text end submit an application to the board on a form furnished by the board. The board deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end review an application for transfer if the applicant submits: (1) a copy of a diploma from an accredited or approved college of veterinary technology deleted text begin or certification from the dean, registrar, or secretary of an accredited or approved college of veterinary technologydeleted text end or a certificate of satisfactory completion of the PAVE program; (2) new text begin a copy of the applicant's valid unrestricted license in good standing to practice veterinary technology from a state or territory in the United States or Canada;new text end deleted text begin if requesting waiver of examination, evidence of meeting licensure requirements in deleted text end deleted text begin the state of the applicant's original licensure; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) affidavits of two licensed practicing doctors of veterinary medicine or veterinary technicians residing in the United States or Canadian licensing jurisdiction in which the applicant is or was most recently practicing, attesting that they are well acquainted with the applicant, that the applicant is a person of good moral character, and that the applicant has been actively engaged in practicing or teaching in such jurisdiction; deleted text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end a certificate from the agency that regulates the conduct of practice of veterinary technology in the jurisdiction in which the applicant is or was most recently practicing, stating that the applicant is in good standing and is not the subject of disciplinary action or pending disciplinary action; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end a certificate from all other jurisdictions in which the applicant holds a currently active license or held a license within the past ten years, stating that the applicant is and was in good standing and has not been subject to disciplinary action; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end in lieu of the certificates in clauses (4) and (5), certification from the Veterinary Information Verification Agency that the applicant's licensure is in good standing; deleted text begin (7) a fee as set by the board in form of check or money orderdeleted text end new text begin (6) a nonrefundable application feenew text end payable to the board, no part of which deleted text begin shall be refunded shoulddeleted text end new text begin the board may refund ifnew text end the application deleted text begin bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end denied; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end score reports on previously taken national examinations in veterinary technology, certified by the Veterinary Information Verification Agencydeleted text begin or evidence of employment as deleted text end deleted text begin a veterinary technician for at least three yearsdeleted text end new text begin , unless the board has waived this requirement because the applicant's current AAVSB licensing jurisdiction officially reported VTNE scores to the boardnew text end ; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end proof that the applicant received a passing score for the Minnesota Veterinary Technician Jurisprudence Examination; and deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end proof of a completed criminal background check. Sec. 50. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.081, is amended to read: 156.081 REVOCATION; SUSPENSION. Subdivision 1. Authority. The board may limit, suspend, or revoke the license of any person to practice veterinary medicine new text begin or veterinary technology new text end in this state for any of the causes provided in this section. The executive director, in all cases of disciplined licenses, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end enter on the register the fact of the disciplinary action, as the case may be. The record of deleted text begin suchdeleted text end disciplinary action made by the executive director deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end prima facie evidence of the fact thereof, and of the regularity of all the proceedings of the board in the matter of the disciplinary action. Subd. 2. Causes. new text begin (a) new text end The board may revoke, suspend, or impose limitations upon a license new text begin to practice veterinary medicine or veterinary technology new text end for any of the following causes: (1) the employment of fraud, misrepresentation or deception in obtaining deleted text begin suchdeleted text end new text begin anew text end licensenew text begin to practice veterinary medicine or veterinary technologynew text end ; (2) being convicted of a felony or gross misdemeanor, including a finding or verdict of guilt, whether or not the adjudication of guilt is withheld or not entered, an admission of guilt, or a no contest plea, as evidenced by a certified copy of the conviction; deleted text begin (3) being unable deleted text end deleted text begin to practice deleted text end deleted text begin with reasonable skill and safety by reason of illness, use of alcohol, drugs, deleted text end deleted text begin chemicals, or any other materials, or as a result of any mental or physical condition; deleted text end new text begin (3) having an impairment that prevents a licensee from practicing veterinary medicine or veterinary technology with reasonable skill, competence, and safety to the public; new text end (4) existence of a professional connection with or the lending of one's name to any illegal practitioner of veterinary medicinenew text begin or veterinary technologynew text end ; (5) having been the subject of revocation, suspension, or surrender of a deleted text begin veterinarydeleted text end license new text begin to practice veterinary medicine or veterinary technology new text end in resolution of a complaint or other adverse action related to licensure in another jurisdiction or country; (6) violating a state or federal narcotics or controlled substance law irrespective of any proceedings under section 152.18 or federal law; (7) fraudulently conducting or reporting results of physical examinations or biological tests used to detect and prevent the dissemination of animal diseases, transportation of diseased animals, or distribution of contaminated, infected, or inedible animal products, or failing to report, as required by law, any contagious or infectious disease; (8) engaging in false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading advertising; (9) conviction on a charge of cruelty to animals; (10) failure, after written notification by the board, to keep one's premises and all equipment therein in a clean and sanitary condition, according to reasonable standards adopted by the board; (11) fraud, deception, or incompetence in the practice of veterinary medicinenew text begin or veterinary technologynew text end , including any departure from or failure to conform to the minimum standards of acceptable and prevailing practice deleted text begin without actual injury having to be established;deleted text end new text begin irrespective of whether there has been demonstrable injury or any sustained injury;new text end (12) engaging in unprofessional conduct as defined in rules adopted by the board or engaging in conduct deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end violates any new text begin state or federal new text end statute or rule promulgated by the board deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ;new text end any board ordernew text begin ; or any state or federal order relating to the practice of veterinary medicine or veterinary technologynew text end ; (13) being adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction, within or without this state, as a person who is incapacitated, mentally incompetent or mentally ill, chemically dependent, mentally ill and dangerous to the public, or a psychopathic personality; (14) revealing a privileged communication from or relating to a client except when otherwise required or permitted by law; (15) obtaining money, property, or services from a client through the use of undue influence, harassment, duress, deception, or fraud or through the improper use of the regulated individual's position as a professional; (16) practicing outside the scope of practice authorized by deleted text begin the board's practice actdeleted text end new text begin this chapter or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9100new text end ; or (17) making a false statement or misrepresentation to the board. new text begin (b) The board may limit, suspend, or revoke a license to practice veterinary technology for any of the following causes: new text end new text begin (1) practicing veterinary medicine by diagnosing a patient, prescribing drugs, performing surgery, or giving a prognosis for a patient; new text end new text begin (2) failing to meet the requirements of section 156.077; new text end new text begin (3) engaging in actions or activities that create unnecessary danger to a patient's life, health, or safety; new text end new text begin (4) making a claim that the licensee has performed or charged a fee for an act or treatment that the licensee did not perform; new text end new text begin (5) publicly asserting or implying that the licensee has professional superiority in the practice of veterinary technology that cannot be substantiated; new text end new text begin (6) practicing veterinary technology under a false or assumed name; new text end new text begin (7) impersonating another licensed veterinary technician; new text end new text begin (8) practicing veterinary technology while holding an expired, terminated, or suspended license to practice veterinary technology; new text end new text begin (9) failing to provide information to the board within 30 days of receiving a written request from the board pursuant to an investigation by the board or on behalf of the board; new text end new text begin (10) promoting, aiding, abetting, or permitting the practice of veterinary medicine or veterinary technology by an unlicensed individual; new text end new text begin (11) being convicted of a felony or gross misdemeanor, including a finding or verdict of guilt, whether or not the adjudication of guilt is withheld or not entered, an admission of guilt, or a no contest plea, as evidenced by a certified copy of the conviction; new text end new text begin (12) using, misusing, or selling a controlled drug listed in chapter 152 or the federal Controlled Substances Act of 1970, United States Code, title 21, section 812; new text end new text begin (13) violating or failing to comply with state or federal law or regulations relating to storing, labeling, or dispensing controlled substances; new text end new text begin (14) promoting, selling, or using a product for treatment of an animal that is outdated, damaged, misbranded, or adulterated; new text end new text begin (15) refusing to allow the board or the board's agent to inspect a veterinary facility during reasonable hours pursuant to an investigation by or on behalf of the board; new text end new text begin (16) performing unnecessary, unethical, or unauthorized treatment of a patient; new text end new text begin (17) having a conflict of interest unless the licensee fully discloses the licensee's conflict of interest to the client; new text end new text begin (18) surreptitiously obtaining through theft, unauthorized copying, duplicating, or other means client lists, mailing lists, medical records, or computer records that are the property of a veterinarian, veterinary partnership, or professional veterinary corporation; new text end new text begin (19) failing to report to the board any disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license to practice veterinary technology in another jurisdiction; new text end new text begin (20) failing to meet continuing education requirements for biennial license renewal; new text end new text begin (21) failing to submit adequate proof of continuing education attendance within 30 days of a board request; or new text end new text begin (22) falsifying continuing education attendance documentation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 51. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.12, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Practice. new text begin (a) new text end The practice of veterinary medicinedeleted text begin , as used in this chapter, shall mean the diagnosis, treatment, correction, relief, or prevention of animal disease, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical or mental conditions; the performance of obstetrical procedures for animals, including determination of pregnancy and correction of sterility or infertility; and the rendering of advice or recommendations with regard to any of the above. The practice of veterinary medicine shall include but not be limited to the prescription or administration of any drug, medicine, biologic, apparatus, application, anesthetic, or other therapeutic or diagnostic substance or technique. The practice shall not be construed to include the dehorning of cattle and goats or the castration of cattle, swine, goats, and sheep, or the docking of sheep.deleted text end new text begin includes:new text end new text begin (1) the diagnosis, prognosis, treatment, correction, relief, or prevention of animal disease, pain, deformity, defect, injury, or other physical, behavioral, dental, or mental conditions, including but not limited to performing medical, dental, or surgical procedures; new text end new text begin (2) using any procedure for reproductive management, including but not limited to the diagnosis or treatment of pregnancy, fertility, sterility, infertility, or obstetrical procedures; new text end new text begin (3) prescribing, dispensing, or administering a drug, a medicine, a biologic, an appliance, an apparatus, an application, an anesthetic, or a treatment; and new text end new text begin (4) determining the health, fitness, or soundness of an animal. new text end new text begin (b) The practice of veterinary medicine includes the use of complementary, alternative, and integrative therapies. Complementary, alternative, and integrative therapies include but are not limited to veterinary acupuncture, acutherapy, and acupressure; veterinary homeopathy; veterinary manual or manipulative therapy, including therapies based on techniques practiced in osteopathy, chiropractic medicine, or physical rehabilitation and therapy; veterinary nutraceutical therapy; and veterinary phytotherapy. new text end new text begin (c) A veterinarian-client-patient relationship between a licensed veterinarian and a patient must be established before the licensed veterinarian engages in the practice of veterinary medicine, except that a licensed veterinarian may provide emergency stabilization or teletriage to a patient without having established a veterinarian-client-patient relationship with the patient. new text end Sec. 52. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.12, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Authorized activities. No provision of this chapter deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin maynew text end be construed to prohibit: deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end a person from deleted text begin rendering necessary gratuitous assistance in the treatment of any animal when the assistance does not amount to prescribing, testing for, or diagnosing, operating, or vaccinating and when the attendance of a licensed veterinarian cannot be procureddeleted text end new text begin providing immediate care to a patient in the event of an emergency situation or accidentnew text end ; deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (2) while under the direct supervision or remote supervision of a licensed veterinarian, a licensed veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant from providing emergency stabilization to a patient with the consent of the client if immediate access to a licensed veterinarian is delayed;new text end new text begin (3) a licensed veterinarian or, while under the direct or remote supervision of a licensed veterinarian, a veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant from providing emergency teletriage, including poison control services, to an animal patient if immediate action is necessary; new text end new text begin (4) any person from providing advice or performing actions that the board has designated by rule as accepted livestock management practices; new text end new text begin (5) new text end a person who is a regular student in an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine from performing duties or actions assigned by instructors or preceptors or working under the direct supervision of a licensed veterinarian; deleted text begin (c) a veterinarian regularly licensed in another jurisdiction from consulting withdeleted text end new text begin (6) any person from providing a consultation tonew text end a licensed veterinarian in deleted text begin thisdeleted text end new text begin thenew text end statedeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin on the care and management of a patient only if:new text end new text begin (i) the service provided by the person is limited to a consultation; and new text end new text begin (ii) the licensed veterinarian receiving the consultation maintains the veterinarian-client-patient relationship; new text end new text begin (7) any veterinarian employed by an accredited or approved college of veterinary medicine from providing assistance requested by a licensed veterinarian with consent from the client and acting under the direct supervision or remote supervision of the licensed veterinarian who requested assistance. The licensed veterinarian requesting assistance must maintain responsibility for a veterinarian-client-patient relationship with the patient; new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end the owner of an animal and the owner's regular employee from caring fornew text begin , treating, new text end and administering new text begin drugs prescribed by a licensed veterinarian new text end to the animal belonging to the owner, except where the ownership of the animal was transferred for purposes of circumventing this chapternew text begin . When caring for, treating, or administering drugs to an animal, the animal's owner and the owner's regular employee must comply with all laws, rules, and regulations related to the use of medicines and biologicsnew text end ; deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end veterinarians who are in compliance with section 156.0721 and who are employed by the University of Minnesota from performing their duties with the College of Veterinary Medicine, Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory, Agricultural Experiment Station, Agricultural Extension Service, Medical School, School of Public Health, School of Nursing, or other unit within the university; or a person from lecturing or giving instructions or demonstrations at the university or in connection with a continuing education course or seminar to veterinarians; deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end any person from selling or applying any pesticide, insecticide or herbicide; deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end any person from engaging in deleted text begin bona fidedeleted text end scientific research deleted text begin or investigations whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end reasonably requires experimentation involving animalsnew text begin and is conducted in a facility that complies with local and federal law, rules, and regulationsnew text end ; deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end any employee of a licensed veterinarian from performing duties other than diagnosis, prescription or surgical correction under the direction and supervision of the veterinariannew text begin or a licensed veterinary techniciannew text end , who deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end responsible for the performance of the employee; deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end a graduate of a foreign college of veterinary medicine from working under the direct personal instruction, control, or supervision of a veterinarian faculty member of the College of Veterinary Medicine, University of Minnesota in order to complete the requirements necessary to obtain an ECFVG or new text begin a new text end PAVE certificate; deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (14)new text end a licensed chiropractor registered under section 148.01, subdivision 1a, from practicing animal chiropractic; deleted text begin ordeleted text end deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (15)new text end a person certified by the director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services under chapter 144E from providing emergency medical care to a police dog wounded in the line of dutydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (16) any employee of the federal, state, or local government from performing the employee's official duties; new text end new text begin (17) any licensed individual with a licensed or regulated profession in the state from providing assistance requested by a licensed veterinarian from acting with the client's consent and acting under the direct or remote supervision of the licensed veterinarian. The licensed veterinarian providing direct or remote supervision must maintain responsibility for the veterinarian-client-patient relationship; new text end new text begin (18) any pharmacist, merchant, or manufacturer at the pharmacist's, merchant's, or manufacturer's regular place of business from selling over-the-counter medicine, feed, appliances, or other products used in the prevention or treatment of animal diseases; new text end new text begin (19) any person from providing training for animals, except that the person must not diagnose, prescribe, or dispense any therapeutic drugs without a license required by the board; new text end new text begin (20) a veterinarian who is licensed in another state or a veterinary technician or veterinary technologist who has credentials in another state from practicing veterinary medicine or veterinary technology in Minnesota during an emergency or a natural disaster, within the scope and location of assigned veterinary medical or veterinary technological duties of the response efforts without passing written examinations or other qualifications, if: new text end new text begin (i) an official declaration of the disaster or emergency has been made by the governor or the delegated state official; and new text end new text begin (ii) the veterinarian, veterinary technician, or veterinary technologist has received an official invitation for a specified time by the authority with jurisdiction over coordinating animal or agricultural issues during disasters or emergencies in the state according to section 192.89; or new text end new text begin (21) any person from lawfully providing care and rehabilitation to wildlife species according to Minnesota Rules, part 6244.0400. new text end Sec. 53. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.121, is amended to read: 156.121 FACILITY INSPECTION. new text begin (a) new text end The executive director, or an authorized representative of the board may, in response to a complaint, inspect a facility in which veterinary medicine is practiced, at any time during which the facility is open for business, to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter and the regulations of the board. new text begin (b) A licensed veterinarian must allow authorized representatives of the board to: new text end new text begin (1) enter premises where veterinary drugs are held for distribution in the state at reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a reasonable manner; new text end new text begin (2) inspect records, equipment, materials, containers, and facilities to determine whether veterinary drugs comply with this chapter; and new text end new text begin (3) collect samples. new text end Sec. 54. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.16, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Food-producing deleted text begin animalsdeleted text end new text begin animalnew text end . "Food-producing deleted text begin animalsdeleted text end new text begin animalnew text end " means deleted text begin livestock or poultrydeleted text end new text begin any animalnew text end raised deleted text begin commerciallydeleted text end for human consumptionnew text begin or for producing food products or byproducts for foodnew text end . Sec. 55. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.16, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Veterinarian-client-patient relationship. "Veterinarian-client-patient relationship" means a relationship in which the conditions in paragraphs (a) to deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end have been met. (a) The veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making medical judgments regarding the health of the animal and the need for medical treatment, and the client has agreed to follow the instructions of the veterinarian. (b) The veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal to initiate at least a general, preliminary, or tentative diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal. The veterinarian must be acquainted with the keeping and care of the animal by virtue of an examination of the animal or medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal is kept. (c) The veterinarian is available for consultation in case of adverse reactions or failure of the regimen of therapy. (d) The veterinarian maintains records documenting patient visits, diagnosis, treatments, and drugs prescribed, dispensed, or administered, and other relevant information. new text begin (e) The patient has visited or been examined by the veterinarian at least once every 12 months. new text end Sec. 56. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.16, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Veterinary prescription drug. "Veterinary prescription drug" means: deleted text begin (1) a drug that is not safe for animal use except under the supervision of a veterinarian, and that is required by federal law to bear the following statement: "Caution: federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian"; deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end a drug that deleted text begin is required by state law todeleted text end new text begin may notnew text end be dispensed deleted text begin only on order ordeleted text end new text begin without anew text end prescription of a licensed veterinarian;new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (3) the extra-label use of an over-the-counter animal drug or human drugs; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4) a medicament compounded by mixing two or more legally obtained over-the-counter or prescription drugs. deleted text end new text begin (2) a drug with the following statement on the drug's label: "Caution: federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian." new text end Sec. 57. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.18, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Prescription. (a) A person may not dispense a veterinary prescription drug to a client without a prescription or other veterinary authorization. A person may not make extra-label use of an animal or human drug for an animal without a prescription from a veterinarian. A veterinarian or the veterinarian's authorized employee may dispense veterinary prescription drugs, human drugs for extra-label use, or an over-the-counter new text begin animal new text end drug for extra-label use by a client without a separate written prescription, providing there is documentation of the prescription in the medical record and there is an existing veterinarian-client-patient relationship. The prescribing veterinarian must monitor the use of veterinary prescription drugs, human drugs for extra-label use, or over-the-counter new text begin animal new text end drugs for extra-label use by a client. (b) A veterinarian may dispense prescription veterinary drugs and prescribe and dispense extra-label use drugs to a client deleted text begin without personally examining the animaldeleted text end if a bona fide veterinarian-client-patient relationship exists deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end in the judgment of the veterinarian the client has sufficient knowledge to use the drugs properlynew text begin , and the drugs are used in accordance with federal regulationsnew text end . (c) new text begin A licensed veterinarian may dispense a veterinary prescription drug without establishing a veterinarian-client-patient relationship if:new text end new text begin (1) the drug is prescribed by a licensed veterinarian or by a veterinarian licensed in another jurisdiction who has established a veterinarian-client-patient relationship; new text end new text begin (2) the prescribing veterinarian has an inadequate supply of the drug, failure to dispense the drug would interrupt a therapeutic regimen, or failure to dispense the drug would cause an animal to suffer; new text end new text begin (3) the dispensing veterinarian makes a reasonable attempt to verify the prescription with the prescribing veterinarian; new text end new text begin (4) dispensing drugs without establishing a veterinarian-client-patient relationship constitutes less than ten percent of total drugs dispensed during the year; new text end new text begin (5) the drug is necessary to facilitate the safe examination of a patient; or new text end new text begin (6) the drug is necessary to establish a veterinarian-client-patient relationship. new text end new text begin (d) new text end A veterinarian may issue a prescription or other veterinary authorization by oral or written communication to the dispenser, or by computer connection. If the communication is oral, the veterinarian must enter it into the patient's record. The dispenser must record the veterinarian's prescription or other veterinary authorization within 72 hours. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end A prescription or other veterinary authorization must include: (1) the name, address, and, if written, the signature of the prescriber; (2) the name and address of the client; (3) identification of the species new text begin and patient new text end for which the drug is prescribed or ordered; (4) the name, strength, and quantity of the drug; (5) the date of issue; (6) directions for use; (7) new text begin the new text end withdrawal timenew text begin , if applicablenew text end ; (8) expiration date of prescription; and (9) number of authorized refills. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end A veterinarian may, in the course of professional practice and an existing veterinarian-client-patient relationship, prepare medicaments that combine drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and other legally obtained ingredients with appropriate vehiclesnew text begin , as long as the medicaments conform with federal regulationsnew text end . deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A veterinarian or a bona fide employee of a veterinarian may dispense veterinary prescription drugs to a person on the basis of a prescription issued by a licensed veterinarian. The provisions of paragraphs (c) and (d) apply. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end This section does not limit the authority of the Minnesota Racing Commission to regulate veterinarians providing services at a licensed racetrack. Sec. 58. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.18, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Label of dispensed veterinary drugs. (a) A veterinarian or the veterinarian's authorized agent or employee dispensing a veterinary prescription drug, an over-the-counter new text begin animal new text end drug for extra-label usenew text begin by an animalnew text end , or a human drug for extra-label use new text begin by an animal new text end must provide written information deleted text begin whichdeleted text end new text begin thatnew text end includesnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end the name and address of the veterinariandeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end date of fillingdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin the prescription;new text end new text begin (3)new text end species new text begin and name new text end of new text begin the new text end patientdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (4) thenew text end name deleted text begin or namesdeleted text end of new text begin the new text end drugdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (5) thenew text end strength of new text begin the new text end drug deleted text begin or drugs,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6)new text end directions for new text begin the drug's new text end usedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (7) thenew text end withdrawal time, deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin if applicable;new text end new text begin (8)new text end cautionary statements, if any, appropriate for the drugdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (9) the name and address of the dispensing pharmacy, if applicable. new text end (b) If the deleted text begin veterinarydeleted text end drug has been prepared, mixed, formulated, or packaged by the dispenser, all of the information required in paragraph (a) must be provided on a label affixed to the container. (c) If the deleted text begin veterinarydeleted text end drug is in the manufacturer's original package, the information required in paragraph (a) must be deleted text begin supplied in writing but need not bedeleted text end new text begin on a labelnew text end affixed to the containernew text begin by the manufacturer or a licensed veterinariannew text end . Information required in paragraph (a) that is provided by the manufacturer on the original package does not need to be repeated in the separate written information. Written information required by this paragraph may be written on the sales invoice. Sec. 59. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.18, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Record keeping. Records required by this section must be kept for at least two years after dispensing of the drug has been completednew text begin , unless otherwise specified by the federal Drug Enforcement Administrationnew text end . Sec. 60. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 156.19, is amended to read: 156.19 EXTRA-LABEL USE. A person, other than a veterinarian or an employee of a veterinarian, must not make extra-label use of a veterinary drug in or on a food-producing animal, unless permitted by the prescription of a veterinarian. A veterinarian may prescribe the extra-label use of a drug if: (1) the veterinarian makes a careful medical diagnosis within the context of a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship; (2) the veterinarian determines that there is no marketed drug specifically labeled to treat the condition diagnosed, or that drug therapy as recommended by the labeling has, in the judgment of the attending veterinarian, been found to be clinically ineffective; (3) the veterinarian recommends procedures to ensure that the identity of the treated animal will be carefully maintained; (4) the veterinarian deleted text begin prescribes a significantly extended time period for drug withdrawal before marketing meat, milk, or eggsdeleted text end new text begin takes appropriate measures to ensure that the time frames for withdrawals are met and no illegal drug residues occur in any food-producing animal subjected to extra-label treatmentnew text end ; and (5) the veterinarian has met the criteria established in Code of Federal Regulations, title 21, part 530, which define the extra-label use of medication in or on animals. Sec. 61. new text begin [156.191] VETERINARY FEED DIRECTIVES; VETERINARY FEED DIRECTIVE DRUGS. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Veterinary feed directive" means a written statement issued by a licensed veterinarian in the course of the veterinarian's professional practice that orders the use of a VFD drug or combination VFD drug in or on an animal feed. A VFD authorizes a client to obtain and use animal feed bearing or containing a VFD drug or combination VFD drug to treat the client's animals only in accordance with the conditions for use approved, conditionally approved, or indexed by the Food and Drug Administration. new text end new text begin (c) "Veterinary feed directive drug" or "VFD drug" means a drug intended for use in or on animal feed, which is limited by an approved application filed pursuant to section 512(b) of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act of 1938; a conditionally approved application filed pursuant to section 571 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act of 1938; or an index listing under section 572 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act of 1938 to use under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian. Use of animal feed bearing or containing a VFD drug must be authorized by a lawful VFD. new text end new text begin (d) A licensed veterinarian is required to comply with the most recent regulations issued under the federal Animal Drug Availability Act of 1996. new text end Sec. 62. new text begin [156.21] DRUG DONATION FOR USE BY ANIMALS. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an owner or a legal caretaker of an animal may donate a drug that is dispensed for the animal that will not be used by the animal to a licensed veterinarian at a veterinary medical facility if the veterinarian or veterinary medical facility accepts the drug. new text end new text begin (b) A licensed veterinarian or a veterinary medical facility may accept and reissue a drug donated pursuant to this section if: new text end new text begin (1) the drug has not expired; new text end new text begin (2) the licensed veterinarian or staff person at the veterinary medical facility who accepts the donation does not have any reason to believe that the drug has been adulterated; new text end new text begin (3) the drug is not a controlled substance; and new text end new text begin (4) the drug is not a compounded drug. new text end new text begin (c) A licensed veterinarian or a veterinary medical facility must not resell a drug donated under this section. new text end new text begin (d) A licensed veterinarian or a veterinary medical facility may reissue a drug donated under this section without charging a fee to: new text end new text begin (1) another client of the veterinarian or a veterinary medical facility that would benefit from receiving the medication; new text end new text begin (2) a nonprofit animal shelter; or new text end new text begin (3) a pound as defined in Minnesota Rules, part 1721.0490, subpart 9. new text end Sec. 63. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 156.001, subdivision 9; 156.01, subdivision 2; 156.02, subdivision 3; 156.072, subdivision 3; 156.073; 156.16, subdivisions 2, 3, 4, 7, 8, and 11; and 156.20, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: H3718-3 156.001 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 9. Operation. "Operation" includes but is not limited to any act of cutting, scraping, or disturbing the intact body surface in any way, and any surgical or dental procedure, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. 156.01 STATE BOARD OF VETERINARY MEDICINE. Subd. 2. Nomination of appointees. Whenever the occasion arises pursuant to this chapter for the appointment of a veterinarian member of the board by the governor, the board of directors of the Minnesota Veterinary Medical Association may recommend to the governor, at least 30 days in advance of the date that the appointment is to be made, not more than three veterinarians qualified to serve on the board for each appointment to be made. 156.02 APPLICANTS FOR LICENSE; QUALIFICATIONS. Subd. 3. Examination of certain individuals. The board may, on an individual basis, permit individuals not qualified for a Minnesota license by reason of graduation from a nonaccredited or approved college of veterinary medicine to take the national examinations in veterinary medicine when necessary as a prerequisite to obtaining the ECFVG certification. 156.072 NONRESIDENTS; LICENSES. Subd. 3. Examination. A doctor of veterinary medicine duly admitted to practice in any state, commonwealth, territory, or district of the United States or province of Canada desiring admission to practice in this state but who has not been actively engaged in the practice thereof for at least three of the preceding five years must be examined for admission in accordance with the requirements prescribed herein for those not admitted to practice anywhere. 156.073 TEMPORARY PERMIT. The board may issue without examination a temporary permit to practice veterinary medicine in this state to a person who has submitted an application approved by the board for license pending examination, and holds a doctor of veterinary medicine degree or an equivalent degree from an approved or accredited college of veterinary medicine or an ECFVG or PAVE certification. The temporary permit shall expire the day after publication of the notice of results of the first examination given after the permit is issued. No temporary permit may be issued to any applicant who has previously failed the national examination and is currently not licensed in any licensing jurisdiction of the United States or Canada or to any person whose license has been revoked or suspended or who is currently subject to a disciplinary order in any licensing jurisdiction of the United States or Canada. 156.16 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 2. Client. "Client" means the owner or caretaker of an animal who arranges for the animal's veterinary care. Subd. 3. Dispensing. "Dispensing" means distribution of veterinary prescription drugs or over-the-counter drugs, human drugs for extra-label use, for extra-label use by a person licensed as a pharmacist by the Board of Pharmacy or a person licensed by the Board of Veterinary Medicine. Subd. 4. Extra-label use. "Extra-label use" means the actual or intended use of a human or veterinary drug in an animal in a manner that is not in accordance with the drug's labeling. Subd. 7. Patient. "Patient" means an animal for which a veterinary prescription drug is used or intended to be used. Subd. 8. Person. "Person" means an individual, or a firm, partnership, company, corporation, trustee, association, agency, or other public or private entity. Subd. 11. Veterinarian. "Veterinarian" means an individual with a valid Minnesota license to practice veterinary medicine. 156.20 INSPECTIONS AND SAMPLES. Subdivision 1. Authority. To enforce sections 156.16 to 156.19, a veterinarian must allow authorized representatives of the Board of Veterinary Medicine, after receiving allegations of a violation of sections 156.16 to 156.19 and upon presenting appropriate credentials to the veterinarian in charge, to: (1) enter premises in which veterinary drugs are held for distribution in Minnesota at reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a reasonable manner; (2) inspect pertinent records, equipment, materials, containers, and facilities bearing on whether veterinary drugs are in compliance with sections 156.16 to 156.19; and (3) collect samples. Subd. 2. Limits on inspection. An inspection authorized by this section may not extend to financial information, pricing information, personnel information, or sales information other than shipment information. An inspection must be started and completed with reasonable promptness.